Utah statutes.
4-15-12.   Suspension or revocation -- Grounds -- Notice and hearing.

The department may suspend or revoke the license of any nursery, nursery outlet, or agent that violates Section 4-15-9 or 4-15-10; provided, that no suspension or revocation shall be effective until after the nursery, nursery outlet, or agent is afforded notice and a hearing.



Enacted by Chapter 126, 1981 General Session

